South Korea slipped down to 118th among 144 countries in terms of gender equality in a World Economic Forum report released Thursday, largely due to lack of women’s economic participation. Last year South Korea was No. 116. According to the Global Gender Gap Report 2017, South Korea scored 0.65 points, coming between Tunisia at No. 117 and Gambia at No. 119. A higher rank indicates a more equal society for men and women.  South Korea ranked relatively well at 84th in health and survival on the back of high life expectancy. But it remained low in economic participation at 121st, mostly due to the gender wage gap and low female representation in senior posts. The annual report ranks 144 countries on its Global Gender Gap Index to see how they compare in terms of gender equality on four key dimensions: economic participation and opportunities, educational attainment, health and survival and political empowerment.Globally, disparities between men and women widened for the first time in 11 years since the WEF began to release the rankings, with imbalances in salaries, a drop in women’s labor participation and lack of women’s political representation being major factors, according to the report. At the current pace, the overall global gender gap will take 100 years to close, compared to 83 years last year, the report said. As for the economic gender gap, it would take 217 years to narrow, compared with 170 last year.The top spots in the gender gap index were dominated by Scandinavian countries, with Iceland placed at first, Finland at second and Norway at third. Rwanda came in fourth, making it the highest ranking non-European country.Asia’s big economies dipped in the gender equality ranking, with China at No. 100, India at 108 and Japan at 114. Among Asian countries, the Philippines ranked highest at No. 10. (laeticia.ock@heraldcorp.com)South Korea’s army trainees are given about 4.91 square meters of individual space at the army training center, smaller than the average solitary cell in prison, data revealed.  According to the Defense Ministry data released by Rep. Lee Chul-hee of the ruling Democratic Party, a typical army trainee shares a squadroom with up to 40 other trainees during the 5-week intensive training for basic combat skills. Each room is about 4.91 square meters, about one third of the minimum housing space stated in the Housing Act, which is 12.28 square meters. Living in such a crowded and confined space is not just inhumane but it could also pose trainees at risk of various contagious illnesses, the lawmaker pointed out. South Korean squadrooms typically have no bed and trainees sleep on the floor.   The government data showed that at least 460 army trainees suffered pneumonia last year. So far this year, 545 people were diagnosed with pneumonia while in training. About 35 percent of the 462 adenovirus - causative virus for pneumonia - infection cases reported in the military occurred at these training centers, separate data showed. With all the negative news about North Korea, the United Nations’ food aid to the country looks set for a donation drought. But Lim Hyoung-joon, the United Nations World Food Program’s Korea office head, stresses humanitarian support must continue, regardless of the communist regime’s nuclear and missile tests.  “The North Korean regime and its citizens are not one entity, which is why the issue should be viewed from a perspective of humanitarian needs,” Lim said in an interview with The Korea Herald on Thursday. “Political situations can be complicated, but humanitarian aid should be dealt with separately from such conditions,” he added. The WFP launched the North Korea program in the mid-1990s, focusing on food and disaster relief. The Seoul office supports its funding and serves as a liaison between the UN body and the South Korean government. “Our resource is based on voluntary funding and there has been a noticeable drop in donations (following the implementation of UN sanctions against North Korea),” said Lim, expressing worry for next year‘s program. Despite the lackluster donation figures, however, the UN official expressed hope over South Korea’s plan to provide aid through WFP. The Moon Jae-in administration will chip in $4.5 million for a nutrition program run by WFP, aimed at nurturing suffering children and pregnant women, for its first state-backed aid to the North. It comes as part of the government’s $8 million aid package to North Korea, announced in September. The remaining $3.5 million will go to a malnutrition project and vaccine provisions by the UN Children’s Fund. The previous administration under President Park Geun-hye suspended all support to the North following its fourth nuclear weapons test in January last year.The move has received mixed reactions. Tokyo warned Seoul to “keep away from actions” that could undermine “international efforts” for regional peace, referring to the UN-led sanctions, adopted after the North’s sixth and largest nuclear test on Sept. 3. Mindful of the worries, the Moon administration said the time frame of the relief project will be determined in consideration of the overall situation including “the tone of inter-Korean relations.” Lim said South Korea providing aid to the North at this tense moment will send a positive message. “WFP provided assistance to Korea after its people were torn from the 1950-53 Korean War. South Korea’s economic development since then is a symbol of hope corresponding with our goal of ‘zero hunger’ in the world.”“The world will move once South Korea takes a step.”A recent UN report showed that about 72 percent of the North Korean population of 24.9 million suffers from food shortages and malnutrition. Among them, 1.3 million, including children and pregnant women, are in dire need of help. “If unification can be achieved in the future, it’d be nice to see citizens of both nations on equal footing in terms of nutrition,” Lim said. He also underlined transparency in its aid program. “We have a very transparent and strict ‘no access, no food assistance’ policy which prioritizes monitoring of our aid supply routes. In the areas we operate, the monitoring team conducts inspections as frequently as 130 times a month,” he stressed. By Jung Min-kyung ()According to the agreement, South Korea “reiterated” their official positions to China over those issues. On Monday, Foreign Minister Kang Kyung-hwa told lawmakers that the government is not considering additional deployment of THAAD batteries and participation in the US missile defense network. South Korean Ambassador to China Noh Young-min acknowledged that China had requested Seoul’s explicit reassurance over the issues, but the government refused to do so. Instead, it gave guarantee that THAAD is not aiming at the Chinese territory, Noh added. “There was no separate agreement other than the official announcement,” Noh sad in an interview with local broadcaster CBS. “My view is that China accepted our explanation about THAAD’s geographical limitation and technological guarantee that it does not target third countries like China and Russia.”Beijing has accused the THAAD deployment of being a prelude to Seoul’s participation in a US missile defense initiative. They suspect THAAD’s AN/TPY-2 X-band radar can spy into their territory, improve the US’ ability to discriminate warheads from decoys and degrade their nuclear second-strike capability. When asked about whether the deal had been supported by the US -- which struggled to keep South Korea and China unified in dealing with North Korea -- the ambassador said Washington delivered assistance during the negotiation and expressed welcoming the deal. “Through close coordination with the US, we consulted with them (on the agreement) and the US welcomed the deal,” Noh said. “The US is well aware of the fact that China’s role is important in Northeast Asia to resolve North Korea’s nuclear and missile threat.”Regarding a possible visit by President Moon Jae-in to China, the ambassador said he was seeking to make it happen as early as next month. Moon and his Chinese counterpart Xi Jinping are scheduled to meet on the sidelines of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation forum to be held in Vietnam on Nov 10-11.In order to amend the fraught relations following the THAAD controversy, Foreign Minister Kang is also seeking to visit China within this month after accompanying President Moon to Indonesia, Vietnam and the Philippines from Wednesday to Nov. 15, diplomatic sources said Thursday. The sources said Seoul’s Foreign Ministry is seeking to hold a bilateral meeting with Chinese Foreign Minister Wang Yi to discuss ways to enhance bilateral ties and rein in North Korea’s military threats. Since taking office in June, Kang has not visited China. By Yeo Jun-suk () North Korea appears ready to conduct another nuclear experiment at its Punggye-ri test site “at any time,” despite signs of damage to some facilities there, South Korea’s spy agency said Thursday. There are also signs that the regime may be preparing for another missile launch, the National Intelligence Service told lawmakers during a parliamentary audit, noting active movements spotted around the missile development institute near Pyongyang.  “The third portal at the Punggye-ri site appears to be fully ready for a nuclear detonation, while the fourth portal may take considerable time to reach such a level of preparedness,” read a press release released from the National Assembly’s Intelligence Committee after the closed-door session. Punggye-ri is where the North conducted all of its six atomic detonations. After its sixth and most powerful nuclear test on Sept. 3, there were three small-scale earthquakes near the Punggye-ri site, which the NIS said suggests damage to the second portal. The NIS said North Korea may seek to reprocess spent fuel rods at Yongbyon nuclear complex by the end of the year, as it tries to further nuclear technology to reduce the size of the nuclear warheads and come up with more models. North Korea has directed its cyber capabilities to extortion, and hacking banks, securities companies and cyber currency exchanges. According to the NIS, a hacker group under Pyongyang’s Reconnaissance General Bureau has made several attempts at cyber theft. The spy agency also said that it has reason to believe North Korean cyberwarfare units have been targeting financial institutions. The spy agency’s claims fall in line with the recent revelation from the UK that North Korea was behind the WannaCry cyberattack in May. At the time, UK’s National Health Service was subjected to an intense cyberattack that used software to lock users out of their computers. The software encrypted information on the affected devices, and those behind the attack demanded bitcoin payments in return for the data. North Korea has denied the allegation. By Jo He-rim (herim@heraldcorp.com) Staff reporters Choi He-suk and Yeo Jun-suk contributed to this report.  He met President Moon Jae-in earlier on Thursday and Foreign Minister Kang Kyung-wha the previous day.   It is also a fact to NATO allies that North Korea is developing ballistic missiles capable of hitting cities both in North America and Europe, he said, calling the North Korean capability a clear and present danger to NATO partners in the Asian region.    NATO takes that threat very seriously. The alliance maintains a strong deterrence posture, he warned. We have the capability and resolve to respond to any aggression.   He said NATO is currently focused on using diplomatic, economic and political sanctions against North Korea to achieve a peacefully negotiated resolution of the crisis on the Korean Peninsula, he said.   The focus now is on how can we put pressure on North Korea to induce them to re-engage in real constructive talks, he said, stressing the importance of full implementation of United Nations Security Council sanctions against the regime.    North Korea must understand that complying with international law is not optional and that ruling by fear and menace puts theregime on the wrong side of history, he said.      Increased pressure on North Korea, with economic, diplomatic and political means, is the best way to make sure this crisis on the Korean Peninsula is solved in a peaceful and negotiated way, he stressed. (Yonhap)   The NIS said that there has been active movement of vehicles around the missile research facility in Pyongyang -- an indication that the reclusive regime could resume its provocations for the first time since the latest one in September.    The agency also said that Tunnel 3 at the Punggye-ri test site is ready for a nuclear test at any time, while it would take a considerable amount of time to prepare Tunnel 4 for a new underground nuclear experiment.    The NIS, in addition, noted the possibility of damage at the nuclear test site, pointing to three aftershocks that occurred following the North's sixth and most powerful nuclear test on Sept. 3.   The NIS also said it had detected signs of Pyongyang having attempted to hack into South Korea's financial institutions.    Amid international restrictions on its efforts to gain foreign currency, the hacking group under the Reconnaissance General Bureau, the North's core military spy agency, appears to be using online attacks for financial gain, the NIS said.   We have detected circumstantial evidence that the North has persistently been trying to glean information needed for targeting and hacking into multiple financial institutions such as the virtual currency trading agency, banks and securities firms, the agency said.   We anticipate that the North's hacking may focus on(extorting) virtual money that is hard to keep track of and may seek the destruction of the financial system, which could cause social confusion, it added.   On the terrorism issue, the NIS said that since 2010, a total of 71 foreigners from nine countries have been deported for their alleged links to terrorist organizations.   International terrorist organizations such as the Islamic State (IS) have threatened terrorist attacks on our country 13 times since 2004, the agency added.   The NIS enumerated three threat factors ahead of the 2018 PyeongChang Winter Olympics: global terrorist networks such as the IS militant group, homegrown lone wolf attacks and the constant threats from the belligerent North.   Explaining North Korean leader Kim Jong-un's governing style, the NIS said that he has apparently resumed a campaign to purge dissenters or those seen as disloyal to him.   Chairman Kim has recently strengthened the monitoring of his senior officials and resumed the purge and executions that he had refrained from for some time, the agency said.   The NIS also said that it would wrap up its probe into its alleged misdeeds during past governments this month, and that it would seek to craft measures to prevent them.   The agency has been carrying out an extensive internal investigation into allegations of its political interference and other wrongdoings as part of its broader reform scheme. (Yonhap)The wife of a runaway murder suspect claims to have no knowledge of her husband’s alleged act, Korean police said Thursday, after hours of interrogation late Wednesday night.  The 32-year-old woman, surnamed Chung, was taken into police custody upon her return from Auckland, New Zealand, on Wednesday afternoon with her two children. She is accused of complicity in three counts of murder. Her husband, only identified by his surname Kim, remains under arrest in New Zealand for a historic theft. South Korean authorities are taking steps to extradite him.Kim and Chung flew to the country on Oct. 23, two days after the husband allegedly killed his mother, stepfather and half brother. Kim, a Korean national, is a New Zealand resident. According to Korean police, Chung accompanied Kim to Pyeongchang, Gangwon Province, where he allegedly killed his stepfather and put his body in the trunk of a vehicle in a condominium parking lot. Local media reported the couple, neither with a stable job, relied on Kim’s mother financially. Police said his motive remains unclear. Auckland’s North Short District Court extended the detention of Kim on Wednesday after a formal request from South Korea not to release him.Kim reportedly said through his attorney that he would comply with the extradition process.Seoul and Auckland signed an extradition treaty in 2001. Kim entered a guilty plea regarding his theft charge. He is accused of stealing a refrigerator, microwave and washing machine valued at 4,100 New Zealand dollars ($2,800) from an apartment in 2015, local news outlets reported.By Kim Da-sol (ddd@heraldcorp.com)Police in Itaewon, an expat-friendly neighborhood in Seoul, received over 370 reports of violence, theft, sexual molestation and other incidents, including calls for help, over five days in the run-up to Halloween, they said Thursday. According to Yongsan Police Station, the Itaewon office responded to a total of 372 incidents from Oct. 27, the last Friday before Halloween, to Tuesday, which marked the day of Halloween. On Friday alone, police officers were dispatched to the scene 84 times. Over the course of the weekend, police handled at least 100 more incidents than the previous weekend. Although Halloween is not widely celebrated in Korea, it has slowly begun to seep into the nation’s culture through younger generations. Itaewon, with its hip bars and clubs, attracts a large crowd of partygoers dressed in costumes. To maintain safety and order in the area, police doubled patrols during the weekend.By Kim Da-sol (ddd@heraldcorp.com)Police requested the warrant last month on possible charges of breach of trust, but the prosecution turned down their request citing that further investigation is needed to substantiate the charges. The 68-year-old was questioned by police last month. He has denied any wrongdoing, saying he had no knowledge of the misappropriation. The allegations were raised during a separate police investigation into possible tax fraud by an interior renovation company that works largely for business conglomerates. In early July, police investigators raided the airline's headquarters in western Seoul and confiscated accounting books and contract documents. (Yonhap)It was an annual ground-to-air live-fire competition aimed at sharpening the capability of countering various aerial threats infiltrating at a mid to low altitude.The Air Force operated unmanned target aircraft for the contest.A Patriot missile first intercepted a simulated enemy jet and the Mistral and the Vulcan shot down another plane approaching the coastal area at a low altitude, according to the Air Force.The Cheongung missiles, in particular, traveled at the speed of Mach 4.5, or some 5,500 kph, to strike a target around 40 km away, it added.Cheongung was deployed to local combat units late last year. It uses a cold launch mechanism unlike other anti-aircraft guided missiles.The military is operating the Block-I type targeting aircraft and pushing for the upgraded Block-II version with the capability of intercepting ballistic missiles. (Yonhap)The prosecution on Wednesday indicted Lee Young-hak, nicknamed “Molar Daddy,” for the suspected rape and murder of his daughter’s 14-year-old friend. The Seoul Northern District Prosecutors’ Office concluded that Lee, 35, has a sexual perversion disorder and committed the crimes on the teen girl to satisfy his sexual desires. He faces charges of rape, homicide of a minor, an indecent act by force, drug use and abandonment of a body. “We will seek heavy punishment corresponding to the cruel crime once the investigation is wrapped up,” a spokesperson for the office said in a press briefing, announcing the final result of the investigation. “Under the law, it is possible to seek the death penalty and a life sentence in prison for him.”Lee, arrested as a murder suspect last month, is accused of having his daughter lure her friend to their house in eastern Seoul, giving her drinks containing sleeping pills and sexually assaulting the teenage girl with adult toys while she was asleep on Sept. 30.Lee allegedly strangled her to death with a tie and wet towel the next day as the girl woke up and strongly resisted. Lee and his daughter then transported the body in a suitcase by a car to Yeongwol, Gangwon Province, and abandoned the body on a mountain there. His daughter, 14, was arrested Tuesday and is being investigated as an accomplice by police. She admitted to assisting her father in disposing of the body. After running several tests on Lee’s psychological state, the prosecution found he had a lower-than-average level of intelligence and lacked self-control, but had no problem in leading an everyday life. The prosecution also said he had scored highly on a paraphilia test, meaning he had distorted sexual obsessions. He was obsessed with showing off his masculinity out of a victim mentality stemming from his physical disability, it said. The prosecution believes that Lee chose the 14-year-old victim to replace his deceased wife to satisfy his sexual desires. His 32-year-old wife, surnamed Choi, took her own life in early September at their residence. Lee’s acquaintance, surnamed Park, was also indicted for allegedly assisting Lee and his daughter in fleeing. The prosecution suspects he helped them get a place to stay in northern Seoul after they committed the murder.Police will continue to investigate other suspicions surrounding Lee and his family, the prosecution said.  Police are looking into the death of Lee’s wife amid allegations she had been sexually abused by Lee and Lee’s stepfather for years. Lee’s stepfather was found dead in an apparent suicide last month amid an ongoing probe. Police also suspect that Lee pimped his wife out for his prostitution business and misappropriated donations, which he received from the public to treat his daughter, for his personal use. Over years, Lee had raised donations worth 1.3 billion won ($1.17 million) between 2005 and 2017 for his daughter suffering from a rare, autosomal dental tumor. He had the same condition and lost all but one tooth while treating the disease, earning the nickname “Molar Daddy.”But he allegedly spent only 160 million won for his daughter’s medical treatment. The case has shocked the public, especially since Lee had been depicted as a loving and caring father by media since 2006. Numerous media reports have since reported on potential evidence and testimonies that hint at his alleged luxurious lifestyle, obsession with teenagers and distorted sexual desires.By Ock Hyun-ju (laeticia.ock@heraldcorp.com)The fire engulfed nine vehicles on both sides of the road. The blazes had been extinguished approximately 40 minutes after the incident.Police said the oil containers apparently fell off the truck on the highway leading up to Changwon Tunnel as it crossed over the center line and hit the median strip. The oil drums then crashed into the vehicles on the opposite side of the road, exploding upon impact.Firefighters initially said that four people died due to the explosion, including an infant. They later corrected the initial report to three fatalities and no infant among them. It is likely to take time to identify the victims as the bodies are severely damaged, they said.  Police said the truck’s brakes may have malfunctioned, based on witness testimonies that the vehicle was zigzagging on the road shortly before the crash. By Bak Se-hwan ()And so the country hopes the cooperative relationship between the country and NATO as global partners will further develop, and wishes it will especially be enhanced in the military sector, he added, according to Cheong Wa Dae pool reports.Stoltenberg arrived here earlier in the week for talks on ways to boost NATO's bilateral cooperation with South Korea and their joint efforts to rein in North Korea's evolving nuclear and missile capabilities. He held bilateral talks with South Korean Foreign Minister Kang Kyung-wha on Wednesday.Noting his trip to the Demilitarized Zone that divides the two Koreas earlier in the day, the NATO chief said he was moved to see numerous South Korean troops defending not only peace on the Korean Peninsula but in the entire world, according to the Cheong Wa Dae pool reports. (Yonhap)President Moon Jae-in welcomed the new chiefs of six diplomatic missions to Seoul on Thursday.Each of the six new foreign ambassadors to South Korea presented Moon with their credentials in separate ceremonies held at the presidential office Cheong Wa Dae.The new ambassadors are Julian Clare of Ireland, Michael Schwarzinger from Austria, Difie Agyarko Kusi from Ghana, Matilda S. Masuka from Tanzania, Piotr Ostaszewski from Poland and Olexander Horin from Ukraine.  Moon asked the new envoys and their countries to continue supporting international efforts to denuclearize North Korea, according to Cheong Wa Dae spokesman Park Soo-hyun.“Tensions around the Korean Peninsula are rising due to North Korea‘s nuclear development and missile provocations,” the president was quoted as saying.“The issue has gone beyond the Northeast Asian region to become an international threat. I appreciate your support for South Korea’s stance against the North Korean nuclear issue, and ask for your continued interest and support, as well as thorough implementation of the (UN) sanctions resolutions against North Korea,” he told the new ambassadors, according to Park.The president also asked for the countries‘ interest and active participation in the upcoming Winter Olympic Games to be held in PyeongChang, located some 180 kilometers south of Seoul. (Yonhap)US President Donald Trump will not visit the Demilitarized Zone, the border between the two Koreas, during his two-day state visit to South Korea due to time constraints, a US senior administration official said Tuesday. Instead, he will visit a US military base. “The president is not going to visit the DMZ. There is not enough time in the schedule. It would have had to have been the DMZ or Camp Humphreys,” the official, who has not been named, said in a phone briefing.  There had been speculations that the US leader would travel to the tense border, which cuts the Korean Peninsula roughly in half, as President Trump said “you’ll be surprised” to journalists asking about it. The official also said the visit to the heavily fortified border is “becoming a bit of a cliche.” Defense Secretary James Mattis, Vice President Mike Pence and Secretary of State Rex Tillerson have each recently visited. Since President Ronald Regan, all US presidents visiting South Korea have been to the DMZ, except for one -- President George H.W. Bush. During the state visit, President Trump will stress the importance of the Korea-US alliance and call for cooperative efforts from international leaders to press North Korea to drop its nuclear arms development, the senior official said. President Trump’s first stop will be US military base Camp Humphreys in Pyeongtaek, Gyeonggi Province, the official said. “No president has visited Camp Humphreys and we thought that that made more sense in terms of its messaging, in terms of the chance to address families and troops there,” he explained. It would also highlight Seoul’s role in sharing the burden of the alliance, the official added. Camp Humphreys is the US military’s latest installation in South Korea. More than 16 trillion won ($14.3 billion) has been injected into the installation so far, with South Korea shouldering more than half of the cost. After visiting the military base here, the US leader will then move to attend the bilateral talks and a dinner meeting with South Korean President Moon Jae-in. It will be the third one-on-one meeting between the two leaders.They are also expected to discuss items related to the free trade agreement, as the two sides are in the process of modifying the deal.In the scheduled parliamentary address on the second day of the visit, President Trump is expected to mention issues surrounding North Korea, the alliance with South Korea and his policy vision for Northeast Asia. His address will be the first since then-President Bill Clinton’s speech at the National Assembly here in 1993. Trump’s visit is part of a tour of five Asian nations, starting from Friday to Nov. 14. Beginning with Japan, he will go on to visit South Korea, China and Vietnam, before wrapping up the tour in the Philippines to meet Association of Southeast Asian Nations leaders. President Trump’s visit marks the first official state visit by a US leader to South Korea since 1992.Trump will visit Camp Humphreys, but not DMZ: US officialBy Jo He-rim ()It plans to meet prominent Chinese figures, including Vice Foreign Minister Zhang Yesui, Fu Ying, the chairwoman of the Foreign Affairs Committee of the National People's Congress, and Tang Jiaxuan, the country's former state councilor.Before Tuesday's agreement, the relations between the two neighbors were at one of their lowest points, as Beijing has vigorously opposed the deployment of a Terminal High-Altitude Area Defense battery here.Beijing suspects that a powerful THAAD radar could be used to spy on its military, while Seoul and Washington have claimed that it is intended solely to counter Pyongyang's threats. A strengthened US missile defense shield has long been anathema to China, as it could temper its offensive military capabilities against potential adversaries, particularly when it is pushing to enhance its offshore power projection capabilities, observers said. (Yonhap)South Korea will neither develop nor possess nuclear weapons, President Moon Jae-in said Wednesday, effectively shooting down calls from conservative quarters to bring back US tactical nuclear weapons. Addressing the National Assembly on Wednesday, Moon said his administration has clear principles in issues regarding security on the Korean Peninsula, the priorities of which are peace and complete denuclearization. “Under the denuclearization declaration, jointly made by the South and the North, giving North Korea the status of a nuclear state cannot be countenanced nor accepted. Neither will we (South Korea) develop nor possess nuclear weapons,” Moon said.  With North Korea defying international warnings and sanctions in its nuclear ambitions, some in the conservative bloc have called for redeployment of US tactical nuclear weapons in the South. Moon went on to reiterate his position that Seoul must play the leading role in resolving security issues surrounding the peninsula, and that the North Korean nuclear issue must be resolved peacefully. “Sanctions and pressure are the means to lead North Korea to the right choice, and to dialogue,” Moon said. “To this end, (South Korea) will secure overwhelming superiority of power. From the foundation of solid South Korea-US alliance, proactive cooperation with the international community will be sought.”Moon went on to say that his administration is working through all possible channels to bring out denuclearization of North Korea, and urged the political parties to set aside their differences on security issues. For much of his parliamentary address, his second since taking office on May 10, Moon focused on the 429 trillion won ($384.5 billion) budget bill and his vision of establishing a new economic paradigm. “The structure in which household income drops and economic inequality grows despite (the national) economy growing must be changed,” Moon said. Since taking office, Moon has called for an income-led growth model for South Korea. As part of the plans to achieve the goal, the Moon administration will create 810,000 public sector jobs. Saying that while a conglomerate-led growth model lifted the country out of poverty in the past, it is no longer viable and must be replaced by a “people-centric economy.” “‘People-centric economy’ is an economy in which the fruits of growth are distributed fairly to everyone. It is an economy in which growth is led by jobs and increased household income that tows domestic spending.”Moon said that the administration cut expenditure by 11.5 trillion won in drawing up the budget, and submitted tax reform measures that would add 5.5 trillion won to the government’s tax revenues. “The budget and tax revision bills focus on employment, increasing household income, innovative growth and public safety and national security,” Moon said. According to Moon, the employment-related budget has been set at 19.2 trillion won, up 2.1 trillion won from this year.Much of the employment budget will go towards increasing public sector jobs and employment subsidies for small and medium businesses. Related measures also include more welfare, which according to the plans would lead to increasing expendable income. New, and improved welfare measures include 100,000 won monthly child care subsidy that will be introduced next year, and a higher basic pension for senior citizens. Regarding taxes, Moon said that higher income and corporate tax rates for the highest earning individuals and companies would go towards shoring up support for SMEs and small merchants. Moon also touched on his administration’s reform efforts, saying that government organs must be reformed, and that corruption and irregularities in the public sector will be rooted out. Moon’s speech drew mixed reactions from the political arena, with the ruling Democratic Party of Korea praising the speech, and opposition parties offering criticisms of varying intensity. The Liberty Korea Party, whose lawmakers held banners accusing Moon of attempting to dominate public broadcasters during the speech, criticized the speech, saying it was “full of poor philosophy (and) unrealistic measures.”The conservative party argued that Moon’s “people-centric economy” appears to be based on the demands of hard-line labor unions, and will ruin the country’s finances. By Choi He-suk ()Police are tracing the whereabouts of a man suspected of spraying ink on female college students wearing stockings at Pusan National University.A 28-year-old student at the university in Busan made a call on Wednesday to a regional police agency reporting the incident where a man appeared to be in his 20s sprayed black ink on her stockings and ran off on Oct. 26.  A similar incident took place on Oct. 18 where two victims-- aged 19 and 20 --were also sprayed with black ink on their stockings, while they were climbing the stairs to the Engineering School in the university. The victims reported feeling “something cold” on their legs and discovered the ink-sprayed stockings with no one in sight. Business College students further reported falling victim to the ink-spraying through their social media. Multiple posts on Pusan National University’s Facebook student page revealed that the situation was getting out of hand and the students felt too anxious to attend class. Some students suspect that the suspect may be the actual “Gangnam Station (in Seoul) stocking terrorist” himself. Last year, a man was caught by the police for spraying black ink on 16 flight attendants and then keeping the thrown out stockings as souvenirs near Gangnam Station. It may be possible that the suspect in Busan is spraying ink intending to do the same. Busan District Police said that they could not find any security footage of the suspect committing the crime and do not know whether there are any more victims. By Catherine Chung (cec82@heraldcorp.com)A police campaign video disguised as “spycam porn” was downloaded 26,000 times on the web over a two-week period. The video in question shows a woman apparently changing clothes from a high angle, as if it were shot from a camera hidden in the ceiling. The woman in the video then turns into a ghost, with an on-screen message that reads, “Watching this woman filmed by a spycam, you could be the one driving her to suicide,” followed by another message that reads, “Police are monitoring this website.”For each day between Oct. 17 and 30, police uploaded this video to 23 file-sharing websites where illegal sexual images frequently circulate. According to an announcement from Busan Police on Wednesday, the video had been downloaded 26,000 times during the two weeks. Police also said the amount of illegal spycam porn on the file-sharing websites fell by 11 percent during the same period; a figure possibly showing immediate dividends of the campaign.The police campaign against illegal spycam footage online, “Stop Downloadkill,” sought to warn downloaders of the unlawful and damaging nature of the illegal content they may seek out.“We wanted to let web users know that spreading and downloading illegal spycam videos online is a serious crime, which drives the victim to immense psychological suffering, and even suicidal thoughts.” an official from Busan Police told the Yonhap News Agency. (mjk625@heraldcorp.com)The officials scrambled to the scene to rescue passengers and put out the burning planes using fire engines with a helicopter flying overhead.There have been no major crashes between airplanes in South Korean airports, according to the transport ministry. (Yonhap)After North Korea conducted its sixth and largest nuclear experiment in September, signs have emerged that its test site in Punggye-ri may be falling apart. A series of earthquakes, which is unusual in the area, have been recorded, while a massive tunnel collapse at the site was also detected. Japan’s Asahi TV on Tuesday reported that at least 200 people died and about 100 people were trapped inside in a collapsed tunnel, without providing information on when it had happened. Seoul’s Unification Ministry said Wednesday that it has yet to confirm the report. During a parliamentary audit in Seoul on Monday, Korea Meteorological Administration chief Nam Jae-cheol said that another detonation could possibly prompt a “collapse of the test site” and spill radioactive materials. “Based on our analysis of satellite imagery, we judge that there is a hollow space, which measures about 60 to 100 meters (in length), at the bottom of Mantapsan in the Punggye-ri site,” Nam told lawmakers. “So, should another nuke test occur, there is the possibility (of a collapse).”Days after the nuclear explosion in September, commercial satellite images showed apparent signs of multiple landslides around the site, which experts described as “more numerous and widespread” compared to previous experiments. Concerned about nuclear waste contamination, Chinese scientists reportedly warned Pyongyang to relocate the test site, as Mantapsan, about 80 kilometers from the North Korea-China border, was at risk of collapse, Hong Kong’s South China Morning Post said. If the site deteriorates, a nuclear waste spill could seep through the border and spoil Chinese soil, they reportedly feared. North Korea’s latest nuclear test on Sept. 3, which is also believed to be its strongest yet, may have dealt a heavy blow to its topography. The South Korean Meteorological Administration said the test caused an artificial magnitude 5.7 earthquake, while the US Geological Survey and Chinese government measured it at 6.3. Smaller tremors followed, which many saw as aftershocks of the detonation. But a US think tank said that “for the time being,” Pyongyang has no plans to abandon the Punggye-ri test site, “given the presence of additional test portals.” Although substantial damage to the tunnels is suspected, similar nuclear tests conducted at the US Nevada Test Site and former Soviet nuclear test sites did not lead to site abandonment, according to analysis from 38 North of the US-Korea Institute at Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies. “North Korea currently has two options regarding military provocations -- conducting an intercontinental ballistic missile test or a nuclear test,” Koh Yoo-hwan, a professor of North Korean studies at Dongguk University said.“However, if its nuclear test site (of Punggye-ri) is exhausted, there won’t be another nuclear experiment anytime soon,” he said. On the possibility of an atmospheric nuclear test, Koh said that such decision entails a massive risk at the moment with US President Donald Trump’s scheduled visit to South Korea next week. At the UN General Assembly in New York last month, North Korean Foreign Minister Ri Yong-ho told reporters that Pyongyang is considering dropping a hydrogen bomb in the Pacific Ocean. “The North will think twice before launching any sort of military provocation around the time of President Trump’s Asia tour. The regime will weigh the current situation and keep close tabs on how the situation shifts after the tour,” Koh added. The Seoul-based expert also ruled out the option of a submarine-launched ballistic missile, citing the North’s current lack of infrastructure. By Jung Min-kyung ()A man dragged two dogs -- seemingly pets – that were tied to a motorcycle in Cheonan, South Chungcheong Province.Cheonan Dongnam Police Station said Tuesday it was investigating the case. An eye witness reported that a man who appeared to be in his 70s was riding a motorcycle on the street with two dogs tied to it, Tuesday afternoon.  The witness urged him to stop, but the man said, “(The dogs) are mine. It’s none of your business.” He then accelerated. The witness said, “The dogs were trying hard to keep up. One of them seemed to be bleeding.” The motorcycle has not been found yet, according to police. By Im Eun-byel (silverstar@heraldcorp.com)Prosecutors demanded a 10-year prison term and a 300 billion-won ($268 million) fine for Lotte Group founder Shin Kyuk-ho on Wednesday for embezzlement, breach of trust and other charges.The 95-year-old Shin was indicted in October last year for a series of management irregularities, including ordering Lotte to pay a total of about 50 billion won in the name of wages to family members who had never worked for the company. Shin was also accused of transferring his shares in Japan-based Lotte Holdings to family members at face value to help the recipients evade about 70 billion won in gift taxes. He was also charged with breach of trust for inflicting losses by giving his mistress the right to run concessions at Lotte Cinema movie theaters.Considering his status and role in this crime and the scale of profits he gained directly or via family members, a stern criminal punishment is inevitable for him, even in light of his (advanced) age and health conditions, prosecutors said.Prosecutors also said Shin conspired with his son and Lotte Chairman Shin Dong-bin for the crimes. But Shin's lawyer claimed that family members, including Shin Dong-joo, a former Lotte Holdings vice chairman, were given wages as the company did not pay them any dividends even though they invested a lot of money in Lotte's Korean subsidiaries and contributed to their growth.The lawyer also said that the tax evasion charges involving a share transfer 10 years ago should not be assessed based on the current standards. The lawyer called for leniency, asking the court to allow the aged Shin to exit from the business quietly without his patriotism and management philosophy getting tainted.Shin, sitting in a wheelchair, said in his final statement that it's a matter of course to pay his family members' wages because they worked for the company.  Last week, prosecutors also demanded 10 years in prison for his son and Lotte Group Chairman Shin Dong-bin, a five-year term for his other son Shin Dong-joo, and seven years each for his daughter Shin Young-ja and his mistress Seo Mi-kyung over similar charges.These irregularities came to light during a fight between Shin's two sons for control of the group. (Yonhap)The weather took a slightly warm turn on the first day of November, Wednesday.In Seoul, daytime temperatures were forecast to be between 10 and 19 degrees Celsius, much higher from the previous day’s range of between 3.6 and 16 degrees. Clouds were to cover skies nationwide throughout the day, leading to rain Thursday.Drizzle accumulating to less than 5 milliliters is to fall over Seoul, south Gyeonggi Province and Gangwon Province. Fine dust levels are to be high in the morning in the central-western area of South Korea.While Thursday itself will see mild weather, with the lowest morning temperatures between 5 and 13 degrees and highest daytime temperatures between 17 and 21 degrees, the day’s rain is expected to quicken the winter in settling in to Korea, starting Friday. By Lim Jeong-yeo (kaylalim@heraldcorp.com)His case makes up one of many pieces of what has led to a massive scandal involving the ousted president and Choi, who are now standing trial for corruption and bribery. Cha pleaded guilty and asked for leniency. Every day I shed tears of lamentation, and I regret what I've done, he said in the trial. I will put a life devoted to having an invisible role first. ... I've already gotten my death penalty as an artist in society. The court is due to deliver its ruling Nov. 22. (Yonhap)Of the imports, rice, a main staple for Koreans, showed whopping plunges of 67.6 percent and 85 percent on-month and on-year, respectively, at 2,396 tons, the broadcaster said. Corn imports of 1,160 tons also represent a 92 percent dive from the previous month, according to the broadcaster.On the other hand, flour imports surged more than twofold to 13,400 tons in September from a month before. The imports are also an eightfold surge from a year ago, the broadcaster added. Of imports, flour took up the biggest share, trailed by rice, corn and starch, the broadcaster said. (Yonhap)The draft, if passed through the committee, would be put to a vote at the UN General Assembly around mid-December. If adopted, it will be the UN's 13th annual resolution on the North Korean human rights condition in a row since the first resolution in 2005. Like in past years, this year's draft resolution condemns North Korea's extensive human rights violations and calls for addressing the situation, according to the sources. It newly urges the provision of consular protection measures for foreigners detained by the North Korean authorities while voicing concerns over the suspension of reunions between Korean families separated by the 1950-53 Korean War, the sources also noted.The draft again holds North Korean leadership-controlled institutions accountable for human rights violations as it did last year, virtually blaming North Korean leader Kim Jong-un. It also urged the referral of the country's human rights situation to the ICC, according to the sources. The EU representative to the UN told the Washington, D.C.-based Voice of America that the draft also points to a connection between the regime's funneling of funds to its nuclear weapons program and the country's dire human rights. It also urged all the UN member countries not to allow in North Korean laborers, according to the report. The South Korean government has also been involved in drafting the resolution, and it will vote for its passage to send a clear message to North Korea, a foreign ministry official here said. The government has been participating in the process of wording the resolution so far and will support the resolution, as well as joining as a co-proposing country, the official said asking not to be named.Since 2008, South Korea has voted in favor of the annual UN resolution. Before that, Seoul abstained from voting on account of its relations with North Korea, except in 2006, when North Korea conducted its first nuclear test.  In a report to the parliament last month, the foreign ministry said that the government will join the international efforts on the North Korean human rights front in order to send a clear message for the regime to improve the situation. (Yonhap)His visit comes amid a near seven-week hiatus in the North's sabre-rattling. There have been no provocations since Sept. 15, when it test-launched a ballistic missile over Japan. The unusually long hiatus has kindled cautious hopes of a window opportunity in which to conduct diplomacy with the recalcitrant regime. North Korea will be watching closely every step President Trump takes (during the trip). ... It will likely have an impact on the level or the timing of future provocations North Korea could take, Kim Yong-hyun, a professor of North Korean studies at Seoul's Dongguk University, said. The best scenario would be Trump's abstention from making aggressive remarks and North Korea's continued refraining from provocations and its subsequent participation in the PyeongChang 2018 Winter Olympics in South Korea, analysts say. Still, they do not rule out the possibility of North Korea resuming its military provocations before or during Trump's Asia trip, as its leader Kim Jong-un had threatened to take the strongest ever measure in response to Trump's UN speech in September in which he called Kim Rocket Man and threatened to destroy North Korea if necessary.In Seoul, Trump will give a speech at the National Assembly on Nov. 8, in which US officials have said he will call on the international community to join efforts to inflict maximum pressure on North Korea. The tone and manner of Trump's talk on the North will be the subject of intense attention.Whether Trump and Moon will speak in a fully united voice during their summit meeting is also a point of concern. They have both vowed to denuclearize North Korea. But the US made it clear that military options are on the table as part of solution, while South Korea is opposed to any kind of war on the peninsula. Any concerns about dissonance between South Korea and the US would be dispelled if Trump delivers a peaceful message that the US does not want war or an escalation of tension but instead will apply maximum pressure, Kim Hyun-wook, a professor at the Korea National Diplomatic Academy, said.The North Korea nuclear issue will obviously take center stage during Trump's summit meeting with Chinese President Xi Jinping as Trump seeks to mobilize the leverage China has over North Korea. There's a possibility that China would step up sanctions against North Korea through cooperation with the US, but we cannot rule out the opposite possibility of China expanding its engagement with North Korea by mending ties with the country, said Jun Byoung-kon, researcher at the Korea Institute for National Unification. (Yonhap)Concerns are growing here that the tricky issues of the trade pact and military costs have the potential to rattle bilateral ties down the road should they fail to meet in the middle.The renegotiation of the Korea-US FTA has fueled fears over the possible termination of the pact, which surely would cause serious damage to their alliance.The Trump administration demanded negotiations to address its growing trade deficit with South Korea in products. Seoul agreed to start the process last month, shortly after the US president was said to have instructed his officials to prepare for a withdrawal from the Korea-US FTA.Later, South Korean Trade Minister Kim Hyun-chong noted his country may be forced to give up the FTA altogether should the US continue to make unfair and unreasonable demands.We entered into negotiations... taking all possibilities into consideration, including the case of the negotiations falling apart, he told a parliamentary audit.South Korea earlier cited its own growing trade deficit with the US in the service sector, along with various reports, including those from US think tanks, that the US' increased trade deficit with South Korea may have been caused by its own problems, rather than the Korea-US FTA.The upcoming defense talks on how to share the burden of maintaining US troops in South Korea is another issue that could cause the alliance to quickly turn sour, according to officials here.Washington has long demanded Seoul shoulder a greater portion of the cost, including cash payments, and the demand is expected to get only stronger under the new US president's America First policy.Seoul, on the other hand, insists it is already paying more than enough, also citing the fact that it continues to provide vast amounts of land for US military bases here free of charge.President Moon has also personally noted his country just spent $11 billion to expand and renovate the US military base in Pyeongtaek, 40 kilometers south of Seoul.The US president is set to visit the Pyeongtaek base when he arrives here on a state visit next week.Cheong Wa Dae officials expressed hope Trump's trip to the US military base will make him realize how much South Korea was doing for its ally.Despite many such pending issues, North Korea and its evolving nuclear and missile threats will likely continue to sit high on the agenda of the upcoming summit.In their previous meetings, the two leaders stressed the need to put more and more pressure on Pyongyang, so the reclusive regime would stop its provocations and start discussing peace.In their last summit, held on the sidelines of the UN General Assembly in New York, they agreed to build their joint deterrence against North Korean threats to an overwhelming level that they said would put the strongest pressure and sanctions on North Korea.The agreement followed North Korea's latest and most powerful nuclear test so far, staged Sept. 3.The two leaders shared a view on the need for the strongest pressure and sanctions against North Korea to deter North Korea's provocative activities and make it start taking steps toward denuclearization, Cheong Wa Dae spokesman Park Soo-hyun said earlier of the outcome of the latest South Korea-US summit, held Sept. 22.Moon and his US counterpart are widely expected to again stress the need for the North to refrain from any provocations when they meet here next week. (Yonhap)Police are set to restrict street rallies against the United States or President Donald Trump in areas near the presidential office in central Seoul during his visit to South Korea next week. The Seoul Metropolitan Police Agency has given notices rejecting most of the 50 applications for rallies filed by 220 progressive civic groups under the name of Collective Action for “No Trump,” according to police officials Thursday.It will only allow two rallies to be held near Gyeongbok Palace, situated between Cheong Wa Dae and Gwanghwamun Square, to guarantee freedom of assembly.  Trump is scheduled to arrive in Seoul for a two-day visit next Tuesday (local time). He is expected to meet with President Moon Jae-in for talks on a wide range of issues concerning the two allies, including North Korea‘s nuclear provocations. It is the first time the police have restricted protests since the liberal Moon took office in May. The president has stood for freedom of assembly since he was a presidential candidate. His government removed the policy of heavily guarding the Cheong Wa Dae surroundings -- one of the choices preferred by his predecessor, ousted leader Park Geun-hye, for security reasons -- and has opened the area to the public 24 hours a day since June. But given the gravity of the summit, the restriction is necessary so long as it does not infringe individual right to gather and speak out, the police said. It is also in line with a presidential security law stating that the office can temporarily designate certain areas as off-limit at the time of a visit from a head of a foreign state, they said. From Tuesday to Wednesday, the central Gwanghwamun area encompassing the US Embassy and the northern part of the Gwanghwamun Square that leads to Cheong Wa Dae will be a rally-free zone.    Police are not excluding the possibility of stationing armed squads in case of any unexpected aggravation from protesters, they said. (Yonhap)South Korea's foreign minister is pushing to visit Beijing this month to meet her Chinese counterpart and discuss cooperation on North Korea and other issues of mutual concern, a diplomatic source said Thursday.Kang Kyung-wha is seeking to meet Chinese Foreign Minister Wang Yi. Her trip to China will likely come later this month after accompanying President Moon Jae-in to Indonesia, Vietnam and the Philippines from Nov. 8-15, according to the source. Kang is expected to discuss follow-up measures with Wang on recent agreements between the two countries to leave the prolonged row over the US antimissile system deployed in South Korea behind them. They will also likely discuss their coordinated approach towards the North's nuclear and missile programs.Kang and Wang met in August on the sidelines of the ASEAN meeting in the Philippines and during the UN General Assembly held in New York in September. But it would be her first time visiting China since taking office in June. Later in the day, Noh Kyu-duk, foreign ministry spokesman, said that negotiations are under way for Kang's visit to China in the near future.The specific date and time will be announced when they are determined, he told reporters during a regular press briefing. (Yonhap)But critics denounced the agreement, accusing the government of making unnecessary promises not to deploy any more THAAD unit or to join the broader US missile defense scheme, nor to form a three-way alliance with the US and Japan.Joo Ho-young, leader of the Bareun Party, called the deal humiliating diplomacy.The government failed to say confidently that THAAD is an inevitable measure to safeguard our security. Rather, it acted as if making a promise of '3 Nos,' Joo said during a party meeting, referring to South Korea's assurance that there would be no additional THAAD, no joining the US MD and no Korea-US-Japan alliance. It's wrong, he concluded.Joo also criticized the government for failing to point out China's unfair economic retaliation.I'd like the government to answer what the difference is between this and the Korea-Japan agreement on the comfort women issue, which the government and the ruling party strongly denounced and demanded be renegotiated, he said.He was referring to the 2015 deal between Seoul and Tokyo to end years of tensions over Japan's wartime sexual slavery. The so-called comfort women agreement has been deeply unpopular in South Korea and the government of then-President Park Geun-hye was criticized for agreeing to never raise the issue again in exchange for compensation without consent from victims. (Yonhap)The proposal came as Rep. Kim Moo-sung and his followers have hinted at the possibility of defecting to the LKP that has pursued a tie-up with the Bareun Party as part of efforts to unite the fractured conservative bloc. Kim has indicated that he would determine whether to leave the party after a general meeting of all party lawmakers Sunday.The call for delaying the leadership election is an act that hampers it, Yoo told Yonhap News Agency over the phone.When a new leadership is elected, the first thing it should do is to regroup the party and shore up public support. ... What members should basically do is to help the party function well, he added.Yoo and those against the merger have sought to position their party as a reformist conservative alternative to the LKP, which they view as a group of outdated old guards with ties to corruption-tainted former President Park Geun-hye.Meanwhile, the LKP leadership has been pushing to strip Park of party membership, as some of the Bareun Party lawmakers demanded her departure as a precondition for any merger with the main opposition party.The Bareun Party splintered off from the LKP late last year amid an intense factional feud over the massive corruption scandal involving the disgraced former president.The LKP is expected to convene a session of its decision-making Supreme Council to determine whether to force Park out. The party has been divided over Park's departure, as her sympathizers and loyalists oppose it, arguing she is a victim of political retribution.The LKP seeks to promote unity among conservatives as it strives to rein in the increasingly assertive liberal ruling bloc. (Yonhap)Once the No Jeok Bong is put in combat operation, it will further strengthen our military's assault and defense capabilities by enabling large-scale combined landing operations of the Army, the Navy and the Air Force, Jeon Jei-guk, head of the Defense Acquisition Program Administration, said in a launch ceremony held at the shipyard of Hyundai Heavy Industries in Ulsan.The No Jeok Bong, 127 meters long, can carry more than 120 crew and sail at a maximum speed of 23 knots, or 40 kilometers per hour.It's equipped with a domestically-developed combat system and a landing operation command center, according to DAPA.It will be tasked with transporting troops, equipment and other materials to military bases and islands. In the event of a conflict, it will be mobilized for transporting expeditious response forces, said the agency. If necessary, it added, the ship will support international cooperation activities, including peacekeeping operations, and also carry out non-military and humanitarian missions such as disaster relief.It will be delivered to the Navy in November next year and commissioned in 2019. (Yonhap)In its report, the unidentified nation said it purchased 1.63 million tons worth $138 million in August and 511,000 tons worth $44 million in September from the North, the broadcaster said.The reported volumes are consistent with those recently released by China's General Administration of Customs, the broadcaster added.Earlier, the Chinese commerce ministry declared a complete ban on the imports of North Korean coal by the end of the year pursuant to UN Resolution 2371, adopted Aug. 5 to punish the North's two ICBM tests in July. The Chinese embargo went into effect Aug. 15. On its continued coal imports from the North even after the ban, the ministry explained Oct. 26 that the punitive step began to be applied Sept. 5, as the UN resolution has a 30-day grace period. (Yonhap)Fears of another armed conflict here have grown with Washington having recently deployed a series of formidable military assets to Korea in response to Pyongyang's unrelenting provocations, including its Sept. 3 nuclear test.The statement also urged the legislature to adopt a resolution to oppose any potential war here and call for the denuclearization of the peninsula.Any armed clash on the peninsula would not only involve massive casualties, it said, but also carry the potential to reduce all we have achieved with our sweat to ashes. (Yonhap)hinese President Xi Jinping sent a rare message to North Korean leader Kim Jong-un, expressing hope for sound and stable relations between the two countries, Pyongyang's state media reported Thursday in a probable sign of papering over their recent stand-offs.Xi was replying Wednesday to Kim's congratulatory message last week on his re-election as the leader of the ruling Communist Party of China at the 19th Congress of the party. Xi will remain in power at least until 2022.I wish that under the new situation, the Chinese side will make joint efforts with the North Korean side to promote the sustainable soundness and stable development of the relations between the two nations, Xi was quoted as saying by the Korean Central News Agency. The Chinese leader cited the need for defending regional peace, stability and common prosperity, it added.The exchange of cordial messages between Xi and Kim, the first in more than a year, came amid a widespread view that China's ties with its longtime ally are not as they were before Kim took power in late 2011. They have not held summit talks with each other yet.The leaders' previous sending of friendly messages to each other came in July last year to celebrate the 55th anniversary of their mutual defense treaty.China, seeking to play a responsible role in the international community, is apparently annoyed by repeated provocations by its recalcitrant neighbor.Beijing has reportedly toughened sanctions on Pyongyang for its latest nuclear test in September.Emboldened by the start of another five-year term as China's leader, Xi appears to be reaching out to neighboring countries.  On Tuesday, China announced an agreement with South Korea to end their yearlong row over the deployment of the THAAD missile defense system here.Clearly, China has become more active in its relations with South Korea. We need to pay heed to China's position on its ties with North Korea, a South Korean government official said, not wishing to be identified. He said a high-profile Chinese delegation may travel to the North in the near future for a briefing on the outcome of its communist party congress, as it did after the previous session in 2012.Experts pointed out Beijing is placing a priority on resuming denuclearization talks. Unless North Korea keeps firing missiles and conducting nuclear tests, China will try actively to open the dialogue phase, said Suh Jeong-kyung, a professor at the Sungkyunkwan University's China research institute. China will seek to show off its role as the chair country of the six-party talks.Before any military action is taken, I think it is necessary to meet Kim Jong-un at least once to understand his thinking and to try to convince him that he would be destroyed if he continues his current direction.The North Korean leader does not have a full grasp of the strength and might of US military power, Thae said, leading him to believe that if he can get Washington to accept Pyongyang's possession of ballistic missiles capable of reaching the US, all sanctions against his regime will be lifted.The former diplomat is in Washington at a time of heightened tension over Pyongyang's nuclear and missile testing. US President Donald Trump is set to travel to Asia on Friday in part to rally further support behind his administration's sanctions and pressure campaign.But Thae appeared to question the US policy.We can educate the North Korean population to stand up by disseminating outside information, he said. However, is the United States really doing enough in this regard? The US is spending billions of dollars to cope with the military threat. Yet how much does the US spend each year on information activities involving North Korea in a year? Unfortunately, it may be a tiny fraction.Thae defected to South Korea last year with his wife and two sons. He said he could not let his children live as modern-day slaves in North Korea after having grown accustomed to online gaming, Facebook messaging, email and Internet news in Britain.Human rights abuses in North Korea are tantamount to the crimes committed by the Nazis, Thae claimed, and the world must come together to stop them as it did to abolish the South African apartheid.Thae said the sanctions campaign should also continue until North Korea returns to negotiations for its denuclearization. (Yonhap)Ahn held two positions at Cheong Wa Dae as a private secretary to the president from 2013-2015 and communications secretary for state affairs until 2016. Lee served as the secretary for general affairs from 2013-2016. Prosecutors believe they were given about 100 million won in cash every month over the cited period, and Ahn took at least another 10 million won aside from the alleged 4 billion-won graft. The prosecution is also looking into allegations that they each purchased an apartment in the affluent southern district of Gangnam with the bribes. Ahn and Lee have apparently admitted to having received such money but strongly denied they took it personally and insisted it was for state management. Ahn and Lee, along with now-jailed former secretary Jeong Ho-seong, have been dubbed by media as the doorknob trio,figuratively describing their power and close relationship with Park. Everything had to pass through them first to reach her, reports say. An arraignment hearing for the two former officials is expected to be held in the afternoon. (Yonhap)About 1 in every 4 high school students in Korea sleeps less than six hours a night, due mainly to excessive studying, causing concern over their physical and psychological health, a lawmaker said, citing the results of an Education Ministry survey. According to the survey of 82,883 students at 765 high schools nationwide on their sleep between April and September last year, 43.9 percent of respondents reported that they had slept for less than six hours per night, Rep. Kim Byung-wook of the Democratic Party of Korea said. The comparable figures for elementary and middle school students were 3 percent and 12 percent, respectively.   Police on Wednesday arrested a suspect in a high-profile murder case upon her arrival here from New Zealand where she was at large for a little over a week, officials said.The 32-year-old woman is accused of complicity in the murder case involving her 35-year-old husband who is suspected of killing his mother, stepfather and half-brother in South Korea on Oct. 21.Her husband, only identified by his surname Kim, was arrested on Sunday by New Zealand police on a separate charge of theft.Seoul authorities are seeking to have him extradited. (Yonhap)South Korea congratulated Japan on the launch of its new cabinet on Wednesday, voicing hopes for a future-oriented partnership based on the right understanding of shared history. Seoul's Ministry of Foreign Affairs issued the statement after Shinzo Abe was re-elected as Japan's prime minister following his ruling coalition's landslide victory in the snap parliamentary elections last month.The (South Korean) government hopes to continue to cooperate with the Japanese government to develop the bilateral relationship into a future-oriented, cooperative partnership based on the right understanding of history, the ministry said.The Seoul-Tokyo relationship has long been unstable due to their territorial and historical feuds. In particular, Japan's wartime sexual enslavement of South Korean women has been a major hurdle to their efforts to improve ties. Japan colonized Korea from 1910-45. (Yonhap)That's why the government intends to slightly raise the corporate tax rate for super large businesses and reduce the polarization with the money, Lee said. We're going to (use the money) to help the poor, increase jobs in public sector areas, such as firefighting and policing, and provide support for the private sector to increase hiring.Last month, the government and the ruling party unveiled plans to increase the corporate tax rate for top-earning companies with annual net profits exceeding 200 billion won ($177 million) to 25 percent from the current 22 percent.Lee said that about 19 trillion won of next year's national budget was earmarked for projects to increase jobs as part of efforts to narrow the polarization of rich and poor. Of that, 83.4 percent will be provided to the private sector and the rest to the public sector, he said. (Yonhap)Therefore we should look into how we can work together on global challenges like the proliferation of nuclear weapons, terrorism and cybersecurity, he said. The ROK is one of NATO's longest-standing partners outside Europe and with tension and challenges related to North Korea and many other issues, it's important we are able to strengthen and develop our partnerships.Kang lauded the military alliance's strong support for South Korea against the backdrop of North Korea's nuclear and missile threats.This year has been particularly challenging in terms of numerous provocations ... we are certainly very grateful for NATO's strong support in the face of these provocations, she said. We need that support from the international community in coming to terms with this growing global security threat. The NATO chief is visiting Seoul to discuss North Korea's nuclear and missile issues as well as partnership with South Korea. His visit marks the second-ever trip to South Korea by a secretary general of the military alliance organization between North American and European countries.Also during his meeting with Kang, Stoltenberg said that sanctions, along with political and diplomatic pressure, are the most useful and realistic means to deal with the North's nuclear and missile threats, the foreign ministry said in a press release.He also stressed the need for the international community to faithfully enforce the sanctions. He, in addition, pointed out the importance of the role of China and Russia in resolving the North Korean conundrum.The officials also signed an agreement to broaden cooperation between South Korea and NATO on six security fronts.The revised Individual Partnership and Cooperation Programme they signed calls for regular consultation and information sharing on cybersecurity, nonproliferation of weapons of mass destruction, response to terrorism, disaster relief, and political and military interoperability and connectivity between the two sides, according to the ministry. The signing would help both sides further strengthen the forward-looking global partnership, the ministry said. (Yonhap)The new administration earlier noted its key economic and welfare policies may cost up to 178 trillion won ($158.9 billion) over the new president's single five-year term.Moon is also expected to renew his call for bipartisan efforts to deal with North Korea.Pyongyang has staged 10 missile tests since Moon came into office. Pyongyang also conducted its sixth and most powerful nuclear test so far in September.The president earlier proposed creating a permanent consultative body on security issues, involving all major political parties, the government and the presidential office Cheong Wa Dae.The main opposition Liberty Korea Party rejected the idea, calling it an attempt to put on a public show.The ruling party currently holds the largest 121 parliamentary seats, the largest number held by any single party but far short of a majority in the 300-seat parliament.The Liberty Korea Party controls 107 seats, while three minor opposition parties hold a combined total of 66 seats. (Yonhap)Celebrating the 60th anniversary of Turkish-Korea relations, Turkey’s Anatolia Color military band visited Korea and performed in the Gwanghwamun area in Jongno-gu, Seoul, Tuesday. The band held up signs in Korean, reading, “Brother land Turkey supports PyeongChang Winter Olympics (which is slated for February 2018).”The Mehters Military Band of Turkey is the world’s first military band established as a regular branch of the military service in the Turkish Ottoman Empire. (phko@heraldcorp.com)He plans to eat and sleep with the South Korean soldiers to experience their service conditions in person and boost their morale, the ministry said.Song will head first to the Akh Unit in the UAE. The 140-strong special forces have been stationed there since January 2011 to help train local soldiers.The minister, a former Navy admiral, will then visit the Cheonghae Unit in Oman. The unit's 300 troops belong to multinational forces tasked with fighting pirates in Somali waters. The unit was born in 2009.Song also plans to travel to Lebanon to meet the 330 soldiers of the 10-year-old Dongmyeong Unit deployed as UN peacekeepers.He will also hold bilateral talks with the defense ministers of the three countries for consultations on strengthening military ties and defense industry cooperation, according to the ministry. (Yonhap)President Moon said the government's foremost goal was to establish peace.What we want to realize is peace on the Korean Peninsula. Therefore, there can never be any armed conflict on the Korean Peninsula under any circumstances. There cannot be any military action on the Korean Peninsula without a prior consent of the Republic of Korea, he said, referring to his country by its official name.However, the president vowed maximum retaliation against any military provocation from the North.To this end, we must secure overwhelming power. We will also closely work with the international community, based on the strong Korea-US alliance, Moon said.He also stressed the importance of maintaining what he has called maximum pressure and sanctions on the North, calling them a way to bring North Korea to the dialogue table.We must decide the fate of our own nation, the president said. We will not repeat the unfortunate history of having our fate decided regardless of our wishes, such as the (Japanese) colonial rule (of Korea) and the division (of the two Koreas).Regarding the economy, the president said his government was working to put the economy back on the right track, insisting the experience of hardship during the 1997 Asian Financial Crisis still haunted many people and firms, as well as government policies.The South Korean economy has completely changed from when it faced the possibility of a national default. The aftermath completely changed the lives of the people. Low growth and unemployment have become structurized, while the pride of being a middle class person vanished. Each and everyone was left alone to save his or herself and their families under a belief that a small government was the virtue, Moon said.Moon said his new people and innovation-oriented economic policy sought to overhaul such beliefs and make the government more responsible for the welfare and livelihood of the people.A people-oriented economy is a bold change for ourselves and our future generations. I believe now is the right time for change, he said.Such a change should start with how wealth is distributed, the president said, noting large family-run businesses, called chaebol, may be taking too much while their employees may not get what they deserve.A chaebol-centered economy quickly pulled us out from poverty. It enabled astonishing economic development that no other country has realized since the end of World War II. But it can no longer ensure our future as seen in our stagnant growth and tiring lives of the people, he said.President Moon assured that proposed government spending for next year could start amending the situation, saying it largely sought to create more jobs, boost household income and enhance public safety and security.First, the government greatly increased the budget for new jobs. It is the most urgently needed budget for our people and especially our youth. Our economy has recently showed signs of improvement, and if the employment conditions improve as well, the economy will be grow at a faster rate, he said.The president also urged the parliament to begin discussions on the Constitutional amendment, noting the move needs to be put to a national vote in the local elections in June to make it possible.Should we miss that opportunity, it will not be easy to win public support for a Constitutional revision, he said.The planned revision, he said, must seek to expand the people's basic rights while intensifying the autonomy of local governments.The president also stressed the need to involve ordinary citizens in the discussion.A constitutional amendment must be a people-led revision both in its content and process. It must be a revision to reform politics and guarantee that sovereignty rests with the people, he said.  (Yonhap)The path to achieving permanent peace on the Korean Peninsula is through peaceful means, he said, and maximum engagement should be applied to both the North Korean leadership and its people.Thae defected to South Korea last year with his wife and two sons.He said he was motivated by a desire to grant freedom to his children, who had already had a taste of the outside world in Britain.I decided that the best gift which I may give to my son is the freedom which is so common to everyone here, the former diplomat said. I strongly believe if we educate the North Korean population we can change North Korea.While the reign of terror of North Korean leader Kim Jong-un can't be stopped, more can be done to disseminate outside information into the reclusive nation, he added. Young North Koreans have started calling SD cards nose cards because they can be smuggled into the country inside one's nostrils.Thae also spoke at length about Kim's rise to power following the sudden death of his father and then leader Kim Jong-il in 2011. Faced with insecurities about the legitimacy of his rule and the failure of an economic reform campaign, Kim proceeded to purge numerous officials, including his once powerful uncle Jang Song-thaek, and accelerate the regime's pursuit of a nuclear-tipped missile capable of striking the US. Whenever he watched the senior leaders' attitude around him, he thought there was a little looking down upon from the senior leaders because he was the third son, Thae said. A lot of the North Korean population don't know that he is the third son.He added: Even after 5 years of power, he hasn't told the date of his birth, his mother, and he could not show his childhood photos with (his grandfather and founding leader) Kim Il-sung.Thae, whose visit was made possible by invitation of Rep. Ed Royce (R-CA), is scheduled to testify before the House Foreign Affairs Committee on Wednesday. Royce serves as chairman of the committee. (Yonhap)  Milan Stech, president of the Czech Republic’s Senate, said during a visit to Korea last week that the Central European nation will participate in the PyeongChang Winter Games in Korea next February with a National Olympic House in Gangneung, Gangwon Province. Stech -- the country’s second-highest constitutional representative -- came to Korea on Sunday with a business delegation. His visit follows earlier visitations this year by a delegation of the Chamber of Duties’ committee on economic affairs in May and the Chamber Speaker Jan Hamacek in June. “We will celebrate the centenary of Czechoslovakia in 2018, and firmly believe that the anniversary will serve as a great opportunity to introduce our culture and country to our friends around the world,” he said at a reception in Seoul on Monday. The two countries established diplomatic relations in 1990 before Czechoslovakia split into the Czech Republic and Slovakia in 2013. They upgraded their relations to a strategic partnership in 2015. The Czech Republic is a strong player in ice hockey, having won the gold medal at the 1998 Nagano Winter Olympics in Japan, as well as 12 gold medals at World Championships, including six as Czechoslovakia and for three straight years from 1999 to 2001. By Joel Lee (joel@heraldcorp.com)Seoul and Beijing announced Tuesday that they had agreed to expeditiously bring exchanges and cooperation in all areas back onto a normal track. The joint statement came after more than a year of tension over South Korea's decision to deploy the THAAD US missile defense system on its soil.Beijing argues the system poses a threat to its security interests, while the allies insist it is a purely defensive measure aimed at deterring the North.In terms of THAAD, nothing has changed from our position on that. It was an alliance decision on the part of the US and the Republic of Korea, Nauert said. One of our priorities is not only keeping our own people safe, but keeping our allies safe.Asked whether the agreement reflects a change in Beijing's stance on Pyongyang, she said, China, I think, is certainly coming around and recognizing the threat that (North Korea) poses. (Yonhap)   On Monday, the chief of South Korea's weather agency Korea Meteorological Administration, Nam Jae-cheol, said during a parliamentary meeting that another nuclear blast could trigger a collapse of the North's mountainous test site and a leak of radioactive materials.Food and beverages of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations were in the limelight last week at the ASEAN Trade Fair 2017, organized by the ASEAN-Korea Center in Seoul. The fair was held in conjunction with Food Week Korea -- the country’s largest international culinary exhibition -- at Coex in Seoul from Wednesday through Saturday. Under the banner “Taste the Happiness,” the event invited 100 food and beverage companies from the block of 10 nations -- Indonesia, Malaysia, the Philippines, Singapore, Thailand, Brunei, Cambodia, Laos, Myanmar and Vietnam.Pavilions representing the 10 member states’ cuisines showcased their products and offered samples to visitors. They also explored commercial opportunities with Korean partners through meetings. Last year, over 1,500 meetings took place and contracts worth more than $2 million were inked. “There is a growing interest among Korean consumers and buyers in ASEAN’s unique, high-quality food and beverage products,” said the center’s Secretary-General Kim Young-sun, a career diplomat and Korean ambassador to Indonesia from 2011-14. “Despite the surging demand, many ASEAN products have not been introduced to the Korean market yet. I hope the ASEAN Trade Fair will be a platform not only for Korean buyers exploring opportunities with ASEAN partners, but also for the general public, who are increasingly enjoying the exotic and diverse gastronomies of the region.”Showcased goods included citric fruit Kalamansi from the Philippines, popularly used in detoxification; jam, juice and snack products made from mango, durian, papaya and pineapple; coconut oil, snacks and juice; packaged, easy-to-cook tom yam kung and pho; organic coffee varieties Robusta and Arabica; as well as various seasonings. A booth promoted the region’s coffees and teas, with baristas brewing beverages for attendees to taste.Prior to the event, a trade facilitation seminar for representatives of participating ASEAN companies was held on Oct. 24. The seminar enabled them to gain an understanding of the latest trends in Korea’s food industry, and also helped build business links with Korean firms.  Korean experts gave presentations on a wide range of issues in the country, including distribution, policies on safety control of imported foods, technological developments and regulations on food packaging. In turn, the ASEAN representatives explained latest trends in their respective countries, followed by a visit to the Daesang Cheonan food plant and CJ Freshway Icheon distribution factory.ASEAN is the world’s seventh-largest economy with a combined population of 625 million and gross domestic product of $2.8 trillion. It has become South Korea’s top investment destination and second-largest trade partner, trailing only China. Bilateral trade between ASEAN and Korea topped $124 billion last year, and is expected to reach $200 billion by 2020. The ASEAN-Korea Center was established in 2009 to mark the 20th anniversary of a bilateral sectoral dialogue partnership. The intergovernmental organization is mandated with promoting two-way exchanges in trade and investment, tourism, cultural and people-to-people relations. It has participated in the exhibition since 2009 to introduce a wide range of ASEAN products to Korea’s increasingly diversifying consumer market. By Joel Lee ()In Azerbaijan, mosques, synagogues, churches and temples fill the landscape forming a kaleidoscopic mosaic. Shia and Sunni Muslims pray side by side inside mosques, a rare scene in the Islamic world where intra-religious tensions have remained toxic over centuries. That the Muslims -- regardless of their denomination and background -- practice their faith in harmony, is a demonstrable evidence of Azerbaijan’s religious tolerance and moderation, according to the country’s top envoy to Korea. Ambassador Ramzi Teymurov stressed that religion being liberal in a world of connectivity and coalescence is more consonant with global trends, such as secularism, scientific progress and democracy.Azerbaijan is a country strategically straddling Europe and Asia in the South Caucasus. It is a predominantly Muslim society, with nearly 98 percent of people practicing Islam. Shia believers account for roughly 60 percent of Muslims, the remainder being Sunni adherents, according to Teymurov. “We have always been known as a nation of tolerance,” the envoy told The Korea Herald at the recently reopened embassy in Hannam-dong, Yongsan District, in Seoul last week. “We never had radical confrontation between Shias and Sunnis throughout history. Our government fully subsidizes all religious institutions and their places of worship regardless of faith.” Although Azerbaijan has had contentious, at times inimical, relations with neighboring Armenia, which currently occupies 20 percent of Azerbaijan’s internationally recognized territory, the country has been embracing of Armenian religious institutions, Teymurov pointed out. He cited the example of the Saint Gregory the Illuminator Church, commonly known as the Armenian Church of Baku: the only Armenian monument in the Azeri capital that survived the Soviet Union’s anti-religious atheist campaign, the Armenia-Azerbaijan conflict as well as the expulsion of some Baku Armenians.Azerbaijan is a constitutionally secular state. The supreme law codifies that religion acts separately from the government, and all religions are equal before the law. Education is also secular. The ambassador warned against what he sees as “incorrect understanding of Islam” -- that it is violent, dangerous and fundamentalist. “Islam by nature is liberal,” he said. “Some radical groups have been promoting a brand of Islam that is ultraconservative and extremist, but that is not true Islam. If you read carefully what the Quran says and what its philosophy teaches, Islam is a religion of peace. It never instructs people to kill anyone in its name, or instigate terrorist activities.”Religious practice is a private realm between God and the believer, and the third party has no right to interfere in the relationship, he added. Pointing to negative portrayals of Islam by Western politicians and media outlets, which zoom in on violence and terrorism, the diplomat said such a narrow perspective only amplifies misperceptions. He also said journalists have a critical role to play in articulating public opinions, as Korea increasingly becomes a multicultural, multi-ethnic and multi-religious society. The envoy urged media professionals to turn their attention to Islam’s rich culture, heritage and scholarship and shed light on them. “Religious architecture and artefacts can be great sources of national promotion,” Teymurov said, pointing to Orthodox, Albanian and Catholic churches, various mosques and synagogues, as well as ancient fire temples and contemporary edifices inspired by Zoroastrianism and its fire worship in Azerbaijan.As an example, he mentioned the Heydar Aliyev Center in Baku, an exotic, amorphous building designed by late Iraqi-British architect Zaha Hadid (1950-2016) -- the architect of Seoul’s landmark Dongdaemun Design Plaza -- named after the country’s late president from 1993 to 2003. Being at the crossroads of the East and West, Azerbaijan also has numerous architectures embodying Soviet, Russian and European styles in an eclectic harmony, he said. “Over the past 2 years, the number of tourists from worldwide visiting our country has increased substantially, and particularly those from the Middle East doubled to half a million last year,” said the envoy. “As we are trying to be a hub of tourism and international convention, we have hosted many cultural and sports events, including the 4th World Forum on Intercultural Dialogue in Baku, Eurovision Song Contest in Baku in 2012, Baku 2015 European Games, 2017 Islamic Solidarity Games and 2017 Azerbaijan Grand Prix Formula One motor race.”By Joel Lee (joel@heraldcorp.com)Turkish Ambassador Arslan Hakan Okcal was a third grader in elementary school in Mainz, West Germany, when his father suddenly passed away in 1963. Left with his bereaved mother and two younger brothers, Okcal would not forget the help his family received from a Turkish consul during their arduous time away from home.“My mother used to say, ‘You should become a patriotic diplomat like the consul,’” the envoy told The Korea Herald last week at the recently reopened Turkish Embassy in Seoul. “That motivated me to become a diplomat. Over the next 40 years, with a career spanning Europe, Africa and Asia, I would not have a single idle day.”Wrapping up four years of his last ambassadorship in Korea, Okcal said he wished to go into teaching and public service after retirement. The 63-year-old diplomat plans to return home this year and retire in a year.“The Turkish-Korea relations are moving brightly forward,” he said. “We are rising middle powers with increasing influence in regional and global arenas, and cooperate closely bilaterally and through the United Nations, G-20 and MIKTA, among others.”The embassy, which was previously in Yongsan-gu, relocated to Jangchoong-dong, Jung-gu last month, on the 60th anniversary of diplomatic relations between Turkey and Korea. The diplomatic mission now has a niftily repurposed five-story building overlooking Namsan and downtown Seoul, 60 years after the two nations opened their embassies in Ankara and Seoul on Sept. 30, 1957. “Last year was a difficult year due to terrorist attacks and the failed coup attempt, but this year opened a new chapter in our relations. Turkey is embracing law and order again, and a sense of normalcy has returned,” according to the envoy. Recent major collaborative infrastructure projects include the Eurasian Tunnel, bridging Europe and Asia beneath the Bosporus, which was built by a Turkish-Korean consortium and opened on Dec. 20. Another Turkish-Korean partnership is constructing the 1915 Canakkale Bridge, which will be the world’s longest suspension bridge when it is completed in 2023, coinciding with the 100th anniversary of the Turkish republic.Hyundai, Samsung and LG have made large investments in Turkey, and the two governments are spurring investments by small and medium-sized enterprises, according to Turkey’s Foreign Economic Relations Board. Okcal pointed to recent large investments in entertainment and renewable energy in Turkey, including CJ-CGV’s $800 million acquisition of Turkey’s Mars Cinema Group in April last year; and a joint venture between Korea’s Hanwha Q Cells and Turkey’s Kalyon Energy for 1-gigawatt solar panel manufacturing plants in Karapinar, Konya Province, as well as capital Ankara. One key pillar of Okcal’s diplomacy in Korea has centered on Turkish veterans’ affairs. Turkey sent 21,000 troops to defend South Korea from North Korea’s invasion during the 1950-53 Korean War, during which 1,000 Turkish soldiers lost their lives and 1,400 sustained injuries. Some 3,000 Turkish veterans are still alive and a select number of them come to Korea on a rotational basis annually through the Ministry of Patriots and Veterans Affairs. The soldiers established the Ankara School and Orphanage in 1952 in Suwon, a sanctuary for orphans taken into custody by Turkish troops from ravaged battlefields. After their numbers swelled to over 100, the orphans were housed at the newly instituted Ankara school, with over 800 graduates between 1952 and 1967, when the school closed. The embassy and the city government of Suwon, Gyeonggi Province, inaugurated a new park in memory of the orphanage in 2013. Two-way trade turnover has hovered at $7 billion-$8 billion over the last two years, and cumulative bilateral investment topped $2 billion last year. Some 320 Korean firms operate in the Turkish market of $906 billion, while over 80 Turkish companies have launched businesses in Asia’s fourth-largest economy of $1.5 trillion.The two countries’ free trade agreement entered into force on May 1, 2013. Under Okcal’s tenure, Turkey and Korea also held numerous meetings and consultations through G-20 and MIKTA, an informal alliance of middle powers Mexico, Indonesia, Korea, Turkey and Australia, led by their Foreign Ministers and dedicated to enhancing global governance. “MIKTA doesn’t focus on specific or concrete issues, but raises larger issues of regional and global significance based on each country’s own set of concerns,” noted the diplomat. As examples, he explained that Korea is largely concerned with nuclear nonproliferation and countering the threat of North Korea’s nuclear and missile provocations, while Turkey has concentrated its efforts on containing crises in the Middle East and resultant instabilities from refugee migration and terrorist attacks. “We don’t have much larger stakes in these issues like the superpowers US or China, therefore it’s easier to raise our concerns and search for solutions together. It’s more like supporting a good friend,” he said. Okcal also stressed the need to reform the United Nations system, a leviathan often criticized for its willful ignorance of the world’s most critical problems. Analysts point to the Security Council’s structure -- comprised of permanent members and nuclear power states of the United States, Russia, China, United Kingdom and France -- as the source of diplomatic gridlocks. “Because of the way the UNSC works, the other 185 countries have less say in international affairs compared to these five permanent members,” Okcal said. However, citing broader problems engulfing the Middle East, Europe, Asia and beyond -- related to matters of security, mass migration and global warming -- he also said the international community cannot do without the UN. “MIKTA countries can raise awareness for reforming the UN for more equitable governance and effective decision-making.”Regarding the future of international cooperation, the envoy said he remained hopeful, noting that younger generations of diplomats, intellectuals and citizens progressively engage and communicate with each other. “There is cause for optimism. They are better educated, well-traveled and technologically savvy. When I started my diplomatic service during the Cold War, we didn’t know anything about the other side, nor what was going on the other side of the ideological sphere. Hierarchy was also very stiff.”On the question of the Middle East’s future, he said the region, where terrorist group Daesh has left abominable deaths and destruction in its wake, has much potential for rebirth.“The long-term solution to the Middle East has to be sustainable development,” the diplomat asserted. “The destroyed cities of Syria and Iraq, such as Aleppo, Raqqa, Tal Afar and Mosul, need to be rebuilt. Turkish and Korean companies can join hands to reconstruct these former ‘jewels’ of ancient civilizations. But the funding has to come from affluent countries and institutions with stakes in the region.”Okcal also touched on recent instabilities arising out of Iraqi Kurdistan’s desire to break free as a new nation-state. “Breaking up is not a solution,” he said. Such “unilateral declaration of independence cannot bring desirable outcomes for anybody.”Analysts say the dream of an independent Kurdistan remains distant and unlikely, as all regional countries Iraq, Iran, Syria and Turkey, where Kurds live as minorities, fear the secession could trigger separatist movements within their own borders.“The Middle East has been embroiled in wars and conflicts over last several decades, so let’s not start another crisis,” the ambassador advised. “What we need is more stability, cooperation and dialogue.”By Joel Lee ()Trump's visit to the base will highlight South Korea's role in sharing the burden of the alliance, the official said.The South Korean government paid the vast majority of the costs for building that base and repositioning some of the US forces and their families on the peninsula, he explained.Moreover, it is becoming a little bit of a cliche to visit the DMZ, the official added. Since the Trump administration came into office, Vice President Mike Pence, Secretary of State Rex Tillerson and Defense Secretary Jim Mattis have all gone to the heavily fortified border.Trump's visit will include bilateral talks with South Korean President Moon Jae-in and a speech before the National Assembly. Security and trade are expected to top the agenda, as in other countries throughout Trump's 12-day swing through Asia.Seoul and Washington have already agreed to address US concerns about their bilateral free trade agreement, the official noted, and will continue those discussions during the presidential visit.Meanwhile, Trump still believes in using diplomacy to rein in the North Korean threat, the official maintained.The president did not tweet that diplomacy is a waste of time. He tweeted that direct talks with North Korea was a waste of time, he said, citing the administration's campaign to pressure other countries to cut off ties to the regime.Trump drew criticism last month after he tweeted that Tillerson was wasting his time trying to talk with North Korean leader Kim Jong-un.Direct talks with North Korea are unwise at this time and for the foreseeable future, the official said, absent significant change in behavior by the regime.I would add to that that this administration from its earliest days made clear that the door was open for substantive dialogue with North Korea, he continued. North Korea has shown zero inclination to engage in substantive talks with anyone in the world on this subject -- not with South Korea, not with the United States, not even with China.Trump will use his trip to Beijing, immediately on the heels of the Seoul visit, to seek China's cooperation in putting further pressure on Pyongyang, the official said. (Yonhap)Seoul’s Foreign Ministry expressed regret over UNESCO’s decision to postpone its response to multinational civic groups’ efforts to list an array of documents concerning “comfort women” in the Memory of the World Register. “Comfort women” is a euphemistic term that refers to women who were forced into sexual slavery during the Japanese colonial rule of Korea (1910-45). “The government expresses our regret over the International Advisory Committee’s advice and UNESCO Director-General (Irina Bokova)’s decision,” the ministry said in a statement, while stressing that it is opposed to any moves aiming to undermine the historical truth. The Ministry of Gender Equality here echoed the statement. The statement came mere hours after the South Korean Culture Ministry delivered the result of a recent meeting of the International Advisory Committee, UNESCO’s de facto group in charge of reviewing the policy for the Memory of the World Program, in Paris. An official proposal was drawn and submitted in May 2016 by 15 civic groups from eight countries, including South Korea and China, for the listing of nearly 2,700 documents including court records and materials handed by the victims. The documents are valued here as an indispensable resource on the tragic history that continues to haunt relations with Japan.Upon hearing the news, a South Korean civic group said Tuesday that the goal of the proposal was not to blame Japan for its wartime atrocities, but to preserve a historical record of women’s rights and how the victims overcame the pain of their past.UNESCO instead recommended the nomination of “Joseon Tongsinsa” from 1607-1811, which refers to the series of diplomatic records of Korean envoys to Japan. The goodwill missions are a symbol of peace between the two neighboring nations. Signs of postponement had been looming as Japan’s NHK reported Friday that the IAC saw the need for further dialogue among “relevant nations” before registering the documents in the program. Japan had been campaigning against the civic groups’ wishes, saying that it goes against the resolution reached between Seoul and Tokyo in 2015. The controversial deal, which received widespread public disapproval here, proposes a compensation of 1 billion yen ($9 million) to South Korean victims coupled with a government apology to “finally and irreversibly” resolve the bilateral tension surrounding the comfort women issue. But the Foreign Ministry here has expressed its support for the civic group-backed movement, saying that it coincides with the government’s basic stance that historical lessons should be learned from the comfort women issue. It also disagreed that such efforts are a violation of the bilateral agreement between South Korea and Japan which states both countries should refrain from criticizing each other in the international community. In 2016, Japan withheld its annual funding for the heritage body after the UNESCO program decided to include documents about the 1937 Nanjing Massacre with Japan’s Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga calling the decision “problematic.” It triggered an angry reaction from China by questioning the authenticity of the relevant documents.Japan currently provides about 9.7 percent of the UNESCO budget, which makes it the second-largest donor of the UN agency after the US at 22 percent. It is forecast to take the lead as the US announced its withdrawal from the agency by the end of 2018. South Korea and Japan have experienced decadeslong conflict over the issue of comfort women in both diplomatic and historical terms. Historians believe more than 200,000 women, mostly Koreans, were taken to work as sex slaves for the Japanese military during the colonial era. Out of 239 comfort women survivors registered in the government database, only 35 remain alive as September 2017. Meanwhile, the Moon Jae-in administration launched a public-private task in July to review the 2015 bilateral settlement with a more “victim-oriented” approach.  By Jung Min-kyung ()Two key aides to ousted President Park Geun-hye, among the few who had avoided criminal investigation despite their suspected involvement in a corruption scandal, were apprehended Tuesday on fresh allegations they received bribes from state spy agency officials.  The prosecution detained Ahn Bong-geun and Lee Jae-man, both 51, the closest and longest-serving aides to Park, with court-issued warrants. Prosecutors suspect the ex-presidential secretaries took bribes from the National Intelligence Service between 2013 and 2016 under the Park administration. Prosecutors searched 10 locations, including residences of Ahn, Lee, three former chiefs of NIS -- Nam Jae-joon, Lee Byung-ki and Lee Byung-ho -- and former Culture Minister Cho Yoon-sun, as part of the investigation into the alleged bribery. The prosecution said it will question Ahn and Lee over why they received money from the NIS’ officials and how they used it. It did not confirm the amount of the bribes, but said it was enough for the court to issue an apprehension warrant for them.Lee Hun-soo, a former senior official at the spy agency, was said to have testified earlier during questioning that the spy agency had given 1 billion won each year ($890,000), totaling 4 billion won, to key officials at the presidential office since Park took office. The money was from the agency‘s budget allotted for “special activities,” such as probes requiring confidentiality for security reasons. For such reasons, money for special activities could be spent without proving how or why it was used. Ahn and Lee, along with now-jailed former presidential secretary Jeong Ho-seong, have been dubbed the “doorknob trio” due to their close ties to Park. They had served Park since she entered politics in 1998. As they were presidential secretaries at Cheong Wa Dae during Park’s presidency, there was speculation they had been closely involved in the process of leaking state secrets to Park’s friend Choi Soon-sil and helping her meddle in state affairs.But Ahn and Lee did not face an investigation for their alleged involvement in the corruption scandal. They were indicted without detention in July only for refusing to appear at last year’s parliamentary hearing on the scandal.Jeong, accused of leaking presidential documents to Choi, is awaiting a court ruling, scheduled for Nov. 15.In connection with allegations ex-President Park took bribes from local conglomerates in the form of donations to entities controlled by Choi and let Choi interfere with state affairs, many of Park’s ex-presidential secretaries, ex-ministers and business tycoons have been investigated, arrested and are now also standing trial. Park herself was removed from power in March, following months of massive rallies demanding her resignation or removal over the scandal. She faces 18 charges, including bribery, extortion and abuse of power under detention. Choi is also being tried on charges of bribery and extortion.The investigation into the corruption allegations, which surfaced late last year, is still ongoing under the Moon Jae-in administration, with a new focus on the NIS. The spy agency under former President Lee Myung-bak, Park’s predecessor, is suspected of having meddled in the 2012 presidential election to help Park win the race. The agency is also being probed for allegedly drawing up a blacklist of liberal artists deemed critical of the Lee government and implementing it to discriminate against them. It is also suspected of sponsoring pro-government civic groups to mobilize them in favor of conservative administrations. The ruling Democratic Party of Korea called for a thorough investigation into Ahn and Lee, while the main opposition parties said the liberal Roh Moo-hyun administration should also be subject to a probe. “Ahn and Lee monopolized absolute power, but they were not held legally accountable. For their private interests, they destroyed the public system,” said Rep. Cho Eung-chun of the Democratic Party during a parliamentary audit on Tuesday.“Beyond political bias, there should be a fair investigation in accordance with legitimate procedures. The ex-NIS chief Kim Man-bok under the Roh administration should also be probed,” Rep. Oh Sin-hwan of the minor opposition and conservative Bareun Party said. (laeticia.ock@heraldcorp.com)